en: Champion Beer of Britain
zh: 英国冠军啤酒奖

en: Champion Beer of Scotland
zh: 苏格兰冠军啤酒奖

en: European Beer Star
ca: Cervesa Estrella Europea
he: כוכב בירה אירופי
nl: European Beer Star, Europese Bier Ster

en: Belgian hops
fi: belgialaisia humaloita, humalan alkuperä Belgia
it: Luppolo belga
nl: Belgische hop

en: Cooperative product
ca: Producte de cooperativa
es: Producto de cooperativa
fi: Osuuskunnan tuote
fr: Produit en coopérative, produit de coopérative
it: Prodotto da cooperativa
pt: Produto de cooperativa
ru: кооперативный продукт

fr: eauscar
xx: eauscar

fr: eauscar 2003 de la meilleure eau minérale étrangère - catégorie eau pétillante
xx: eauscar 2003 de la meilleure eau minérale étrangère - catégorie eau pétillante

en: International Ice Cream Consortium award, IICC
xx: International Ice Cream Consortium award, IICC

en: International Ice Cream Consortium award best ice cream 2019
xx: International Ice Cream Consortium award best ice cream 2019

en: International Ice Cream Consortium award most innovative ice cream 2019
xx: International Ice Cream Consortium award most innovative ice cream 2019

en: International Ice Cream Consortium award best technical solution 2019
xx: International Ice Cream Consortium award best technical solution 2019

en: International Ice Cream Consortium award best commercial solution 2019
xx: International Ice Cream Consortium award best commercial solution 2019

en: International Ice Cream Consortium award ice cream maker of the year 2019
xx: International Ice Cream Consortium award ice cream maker of the year 2019

en: International Ice Cream Consortium award best ice cream 2018
xx: International Ice Cream Consortium award best ice cream 2018

en: International Ice Cream Consortium award most innovative ice cream 2018
xx: International Ice Cream Consortium award most innovative ice cream 2018

en: International Ice Cream Consortium award best technical solution 2018
xx: International Ice Cream Consortium award best technical solution 2018

en: International Ice Cream Consortium award best commercial solution 2018
xx: International Ice Cream Consortium award best commercial solution 2018

en: International Ice Cream Consortium award ice cream maker of the year 2018
xx: International Ice Cream Consortium award ice cream maker of the year 2018

en: International Ice Cream Consortium award best ice cream 2017
xx: International Ice Cream Consortium award best ice cream 2017

en: International Ice Cream Consortium award most innovative ice cream 2017
xx: International Ice Cream Consortium award most innovative ice cream 2017